Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1312
Confession of judgment by attorney; warrant; requirements.

Every attorney who shall confess judgment in any case, shall, at the time of making such confession, produce the warrant of attorney for making the same to the court before which he makes the confession; and the original or a copy of the warrant shall be filed with the clerk of the court in which the judgment shall be entered.

R.S.1867, Code § 436, p. 466;

R.S.1913, § 8005;

C.S.1922, § 8946;

C.S.1929, § 20-1312;

R.S.1943, § 25-1312.

Judgment on appeal, entered by consent, is not "judgment by confession." Wabaska Electric Co. v. City of Blue Springs, 84 Neb. 577, 122 N.W. 21 (1909).

County attorney must show warrant, or judgment against county is void. Custer County v. Chicago, B. & Q. R. R. Co., 62 Neb. 657, 87 N.W. 341 (1901).

Judgment by confession against corporation, unless warrant of attorney is produced, is void. Fogg v. Ellis, 61 Neb. 829, 86 N.W. 494 (1901).

Authority of attorney to confess judgment under warrant in promissory note, without issuance of summons, raised but not decided. Wiley v. Neal, 24 Neb. 141, 37 N.W. 926 (1888).